District of Columbia statutes.
32-1231.02

Provision of reasonable accommodation.

(a)

An employer shall engage in good faith in a timely and interactive process with an employee requesting or otherwise needing a reasonable accommodation to determine a reasonable accommodation for that employee.

(b)

(1)

An employer may require an employee to provide a certification from the employee's health care provider concerning the medical advisability of a reasonable accommodation to the same extent a certification is required for other temporary disabilities.

(2)

A certification shall include:

(A)

The date the reasonable accommodation became or will become medically advisable;

(B)

An explanatory statement as to the medical condition and the advisability of providing the reasonable accommodation in light of the condition; and

(C)

The probable duration that the reasonable accommodation will need to be provided.

(c)

In any proceeding brought under this chapter, the employer shall have the burden of establishing that it would be an undue hardship to provide a reasonable accommodation.

History

Mar. 3, 2015, D.C. Law 20-168, § 3, 61 DCR 11368